Utah statutes.
31A-23a-106.   License types.
(1) (a)  A resident or nonresident license issued under this chapter shall be
issued under the license types described under Subsection (2).
(b)  A license type and a line of authority pertaining to a license type
describe the type of licensee and the lines of business that a licensee may
sell, solicit, or negotiate. A license type is intended to describe the
matters to be considered under any education, examination, and training
required of a license applicant under Sections 31A-23a-108, 31A-23a-202, and
31A-23a-203.
(2) (a)  A producer license type includes the following lines of authority:
(i)  life insurance, including a nonvariable contract;
(ii)  variable contracts, including variable life and annuity, if the producer
has the life insurance line of authority;
(iii)  accident and health insurance, including a contract issued to a
policyholder under Chapter 7, Nonprofit Health Service Insurance Corporations,
or Chapter 8, Health Maintenance Organizations and Limited Health Plans;
(iv)  property insurance;
(v)  casualty insurance, including a surety or other bond;
(vi)  title insurance under one or more of the following categories:
(A)  search, including authority to act as a title marketing representative;
(B)  escrow, including authority to act as a title marketing representative;
and
(C)  title marketing representative only;
(vii)  personal lines insurance; and
(viii)  surplus lines, if the producer has the property or casualty or both
lines of authority.
(b)  A limited line producer license type includes the following limited lines
of authority:
(i)  limited line credit insurance;
(ii)  travel insurance;
(iii)  motor club insurance;
(iv)  car rental related insurance;
(v)  legal expense insurance;
(vi)  crop insurance;
(vii)  self-service storage insurance; and
(viii)  bail bond producer.
(c)  A customer service representative license type includes the following
lines of authority, if held by the customer service representative's employer
producer:
(i)  life insurance, including a nonvariable contract;
(ii)  accident and health insurance, including a contract issued to a
policyholder under Chapter 7, Nonprofit Health Service Insurance Corporations,
or Chapter 8, Health Maintenance Organizations and Limited Health Plans;
(iii)  property insurance;
(iv)  casualty insurance, including a surety or other bond;
(v)  personal lines insurance; and
(vi)  surplus lines, if the employer producer has the property or casualty or
both lines of authority.
(d)  A consultant license type includes the following lines of authority:
(i)  life insurance, including a nonvariable contract;
(ii)  variable contracts, including variable life and annuity, if the
consultant has the life insurance line of authority;
(iii)  accident and health insurance, including a contract issued to a
policyholder under Chapter 7, Nonprofit Health Service Insurance Corporations,
or Chapter 8, Health Maintenance Organizations and Limited Health Plans;
(iv)  property insurance;
(v)  casualty insurance, including a surety or other bond; and
(vi)  personal lines insurance.
(e)  A managing general agent license type includes the following lines of
authority:
(i)  life insurance, including a nonvariable contract;
(ii)  variable contracts, including variable life and annuity, if the managing
general agent has the life insurance line of authority;
(iii)  accident and health insurance, including a contract issued to a
policyholder under Chapter 7, Nonprofit Health Service Insurance Corporations,
or Chapter 8, Health Maintenance Organizations and Limited Health Plans;
(iv)  property insurance;
(v)  casualty insurance, including a surety or other bond; and
(vi)  personal lines insurance.
(f)  A reinsurance intermediary license type includes the following lines of
authority:
(i)  life insurance, including a nonvariable contract;
(ii)  variable contracts, including variable life and annuity, if the
reinsurance intermediary has the life insurance line of authority;
(iii)  accident and health insurance, including a contract issued to a
policyholder under Chapter 7, Nonprofit Health Service Insurance Corporations,
or Chapter 8, Health Maintenance Organizations and Limited Health Plans;
(iv)  property insurance;
(v)  casualty insurance, including a surety or other bond; and
(vi)  personal lines insurance.
(g)  A holder of licenses under Subsections (2)(a), (d), (e), and (f) has all
qualifications necessary to act as a holder of a license under Subsections
(2)(b) and (c).
(3) (a)  The commissioner may by rule recognize other producer, limited line
producer, customer service representative, consultant, managing general agent,
or reinsurance intermediary lines of authority as to kinds of insurance not
listed under Subsections (2)(a) through (f).
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), for purposes of title insurance the
Title and Escrow Commission may by rule, with the concurrence of the
commissioner and subject to Section 31A-2-404, recognize other categories for
a title insurance producer line of authority not listed under Subsection
(2)(a)(vi).
(4)  The variable contracts, including variable life and annuity line of
authority requires:
(a)  licensure as a registered agent or broker by the National Association of
Securities Dealers; and
(b)  current registration with a securities broker-dealer.
(5)  A surplus lines producer is a producer who has a surplus lines line of
authority.
